Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 17-18-401.
No effect on other actions; no liability.

This act does not effect, directly or indirectly, the validity of another action by the board of directors of a corporation, nor does it preclude the board of directors from taking other action in accordance with law. The board of directors incurs no liability for elections made or not made under this act.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

§ 17-18-402.
Conflict of laws.

If a provision of this act conflicts with another provision of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, the provision of this act controls.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see §

17-16-101

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).

§ 17-18-403.
Prohibition against waivers.

A condition, stipulation or other provision in an agreement or transaction between any shareholders of a corporation that purports to waive compliance with or the rights afforded stockholders under this act is void.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 17-18-102(b)(xx).